Washington statutes.
RCW 18.32.222

Commission report—Foreign-trained dentists—Licensure.

By November 15, 2009, the commission shall report to the governor and the legislature with recommendations for appropriate standards for issuing a license to a foreign-trained dentist. The recommendations shall consider the balance between maintaining assurances that Washington's dental professionals are well-qualified and planning for an adequate supply of dentists to meet the future needs of Washington's diverse urban and rural communities. In addition to considering the use of standards established by accreditation organizations, the recommendations shall consider other options to reduce barriers to licensure.

[ 2008 c 147 s 2.]